Louisiana, session 2026, HB1243.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4071, 4072(A) and (B), 4073, 4074, 4123, and 4159.2(A), (B)(1),
and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4071. Creation and organization of sewerage and water board
A.(1) The public water system, the public sewerage system, and the public
drainage system of the city of New Orleans shall be constructed, controlled,
maintained, and operated by a sewerage and water board. The composition of the
board may be as set forth in the New Orleans home rule charter, unless otherwise
provided by law. The New Orleans city council may, by ordinance in accordance
with applicable state law, prescribe rules and regulations governing the appointment,
terms, and service of board members. to be composed as follows:
(a) The mayor.
(b) The chair of the Public Works, Sanitation and Environment Committee
of the New Orleans city council or an appointee selected by the council president
Page 1 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1243 ENROLLED
with a background in engineering, law, or consumer advocacy selected with the
advice and consent of the city council. Any member appointed by the council
president shall serve at the pleasure of the council president.
(c) Two syndicate members of the board of liquidation, city debt, to be
appointed by the mayor on the recommendation of the board of liquidation, city debt.
(d) Seven citizens, to be appointed by the mayor, with the advice and consent
of the city council from a list of nominees submitted by the Sewerage and Water
Board Selection Committee.
(e) The members appointed pursuant to Subparagraphs (c) and (d) of this
Paragraph shall include one citizen from each of the five councilmanic districts
within the city of New Orleans. In addition, two of the appointments shall be
consumer advocates with community advocacy or consumer protection experience
or experience in a related field.
(2)(a) For purposes of this Section, the Sewerage and Water Board Selection
Committee, hereinafter referred to as the "selection committee", is hereby created to
be comprised as follows:
(i) The president of Dillard University or the president's designee.
(ii) The president of Loyola University or the president's designee.
(iii) The president of Tulane University or the president's designee.
(iv) The president of Xavier University or the president's designee.
(v) The chancellor of Delgado Community College or the chancellor's
designee.
(vi) The chancellor of University of New Orleans or the chancellor's
designee.
(vii) The chancellor of Southern University at New Orleans or the
chancellor's designee.
(viii) The chair of the board of directors of the New Orleans Chamber of
Commerce or the chair's designee.
(ix) The president of the board of directors of the New Orleans Regional
Black Chamber of Commerce or the president's designee.
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1243 ENROLLED
(x) The chair of the board of directors of the Urban League of Greater New
Orleans or the chair's designee.
(b) Notice of a vacancy on the sewerage and water board shall be published
in the official journal for Orleans Parish by the sewerage and water board and shall
be communicated through any other publication, website, or electronic medium
maintained by the New Orleans Sewerage and Water Board or the city of New
Orleans for the purpose of achieving public awareness of the vacancy. Such notice
shall advise potential candidates of the residency requirements, professional
qualifications, and application deadlines. Such notices shall be published no less
than two times within a thirty day period after a vacancy has been declared by the
sewerage and water board. Any interested person who meets the qualifications
provided for in this Section shall submit an application to the sewerage and water
board confirming their eligibility, professional qualifications, and experience. The
sewerage and water board shall transmit all applications received to the selection
committee within seven days after the deadline for submission of applications.
(c) The selection committee shall meet no less than fifteen days and no more
than thirty days after close of the application deadline to consider each name
submitted for nomination. Selection committee members may also submit names of
persons who also meet the qualification requirements provided in this Section. The
selection committee shall verify that each nominee meets such qualification
requirements. After a thorough review of each application, the selection committee
shall by majority vote submit to the mayor three names for each vacancy on the
sewerage and water board.
(d) Within sixty days of receipt of the list of nominees, the mayor shall select
one of the three nominees for submission to the city council for approval.
(e) The city council shall have thirty days from receipt of submission of the
nomination by the mayor to disapprove the nominee. If the city council does not
disapprove the nominee within such time, it shall be deemed that the city council
consents to the appointment.
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1243 ENROLLED
(f) If the city council disapproves the nominee from the mayor, the selection
committee shall convene in no less than thirty days and no more than sixty days after
disapproval to resubmit three nominees to the mayor.
(g) If for any reason the mayor fails to submit a nomination to the city
council within sixty days of receipt of the list of nominees by the selection
committee, the selection committee shall submit such list of nominees directly to the
city council for selection and approval.
(3) Each nominee shall have experience in either architecture, environmental
quality, finance, accounting, business administration, engineering, law, public health,
urban planning, facilities management, public administration, science, construction,
business management, community or consumer advocacy, or other pertinent
disciplines.
(4)(a) For members appointed pursuant to Subparagraphs (1)(c) and (d) of
this Subsection, the terms of office shall be four years after initial terms as provided
in Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph. A member shall serve no more than two
consecutive terms of office.
(b) Three members shall serve an initial term of one year; three members
shall serve an initial term of two years; three members shall serve an initial term of
three years; and two members shall serve an initial term of four years, as determined
by lot at the first meeting of the board.
(5) If the mayor is unable to attend a meeting of the sewerage and water
board, the mayor may be represented at the board meeting by a person designated by
the mayor who shall be an unclassified member of the mayor's administration. The
person shall have all rights and powers granted to the mayor with regard to any such
board meeting including the right to vote and shall be counted for purposes of a
quorum.
(6) The appointments to the board shall reflect the racial and gender diversity
of the population of the city of New Orleans to the extent practicable.
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1243 ENROLLED
B.(1) Each of the citizen members shall be a registered voter in Orleans
Parish and shall have been a domiciliary of Orleans Parish for two years previous to
his appointment.
(2) In the event any appointed member is elected to any office or removes
his domicile from Orleans Parish, his membership on the board shall be ipso facto
vacated, and his successor shall be immediately appointed.
C. All vacancies occurring in the membership of the board under
appointment by the mayor shall be filled in the manner prescribed by this Section for
the original appointment.
D. No person who is a stockholder or bondholder in any sewerage or
waterworks company or who holds any public office yielding emoluments to the
holder other than those specified in this Part shall be eligible for appointment to the
board.
E. B. A Subject to limitations provided in this Part, a quorum of the board
shall adopt rules fixing its own meetings and procedures. Any amendments or
changes to such rules shall be adopted only after approved by a quorum of the board.
F. C. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the board may
adopt rules and procedures authorizing the adjusting, releasing, or extinguishing of
any indebtedness from a customer's sewerage and water bill. The rule shall limit the
board's compromising authority to appropriate instances in which any of the
following occur:
(1) Instances of error on the part of the district such as equipment failure or
process failure, including instances in which the board generates inaccurate invoices,
and in such instances, only to the extent that the failure increased the customer's
indebtedness.
(2) Instances in which an employee of the board, or a person acting on behalf
of the board, fails to properly read a customer's water meter regardless of whether
the board has submitted an invoice to the customer for an amount owed during any
such period or fails to submit an invoice to the customer for two or more consecutive
months.
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1243 ENROLLED
(3) Instances of error not on the part of the customer due to unforeseen
damage or an extreme weather-related event or mandatory evacuation, and in such
instances, only to the extent the situation increased the customer's indebtedness.
(4) Instances where the customer is disproportionately impoverished or
needy and qualifies for an adjustment, release, or extinguishment pursuant to an
established social welfare program of the district.
§4072. Drainage operations; city of New Orleans
A. At the beginning of every quarter, the Coastal Protection Restoration
Authority, the Louisiana Department of Transportation and Development, the
Governor's Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness, and
representatives from the Jefferson Parish Department of Public Works, the Saint
Bernard Parish Department of Public Works, and the Plaquemines Parish
Engineering & Public Works Department shall meet with the executive director of
the Sewerage and Water Board of New Orleans and his team the director of public
works for the city of New Orleans, or his designee, to develop a coordinated
southeast Louisiana urban flood prevention plan. The purposes of the meetings shall
be to identify areas that need to be addressed in order to allow for proper drainage,
to model and predict storm drainage in the multiparish area, and to anticipate
emergency response priorities. The plan shall be presented to the members of the
New Orleans Delegation and the city council of New Orleans annually on May
fifteenth, beginning May 15, 2025.
B.(1) The Unless otherwise provided by the parish governing authority or
other law to the contrary, the Sewerage and Water Board of New Orleans shall be
responsible for all drainage operations in the city of New Orleans. The city of New
Orleans shall may transfer all employees and equipment used for drainage
maintenance to the Sewerage and Water Board of New Orleans.
(2) The city of New Orleans shall allocate on an annual basis to the
Sewerage and Water Board of New Orleans the same level of funding that the New
Orleans Department of Public Works utilized in Fiscal Year 2023 for drainage
operations unless such operations are maintained by any other public entity. Any
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1243 ENROLLED
other increases in funding by the city of New Orleans to the Sewerage and Water
Board of New Orleans shall be subject to New Orleans City Council approval.
"Public entity" for purposes of this Part shall have the same meaning as provided in
R.S. 39:1421(2).
* * *
§4073. Officers of sewerage and water board; compensation of members
The mayor shall be ex officio president of the board shall elect from its
membership a president and a president pro tempore. The board shall also elect an
executive director, whose salary and bond shall be fixed by the board. The executive
director shall hold office at the pleasure of the board. The election or removal of the
executive director, the amount of his salary, and the acceptance of his bond shall be
determined by a majority vote of the entire board at one of its regular monthly
meetings. The duties of the executive director shall be fixed by the board. No
member of the board shall receive any salary or compensation for his services,
except actual expenses incurred in travelling traveling by authority of, or for the
benefit of the board. The board shall have power to elect one of its members
president pro tempore who shall act in the absence or disability of the president.
§4074. Meetings of the board
All meetings of the board shall be held in accordance with rules adopted by
the board and shall be open and public as provided by ordinance adopted pursuant
to R.S. 33:4159.2. All board meetings shall be conducted in accordance with the
Open Meetings Law. All its transactions shall be recorded in the minutes to be kept
in writing by the executive director, and its records shall be public. Six members
thereof shall constitute a quorum.
* * *
§4123. New Orleans; rules and regulations; provisions self-operative; board
continued; repeal; severability
A. The Subject to limitations provided in this Part, the board may make
reasonable rules and regulations necessary for the proper administration of the
sewerage system.
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1243 ENROLLED
B. The provisions hereof are self-operative, and the sewerage and water
board of New Orleans, the Board of Liquidation, City Debt, and the council of the
city of New Orleans, or its successor as the governing body of said city of New
Orleans shall have full power to carry them into effect.
C. The Board of Liquidation, City Debt, as now organized and created, and
with the powers, duties and functions prescribed by existing laws and by the
constitution, shall be continued while any bonds authorized by R.S. 33:4121 are
outstanding and unpaid.
D. No proceedings or approvals, not required by the provisions of this
Section, shall be necessary to the validity of such bonds.
E. Any provision of the constitution or any law in conflict herewith is hereby
repealed. Should any provision hereof be declared null and void, such declaration
shall not affect the balance of this amendment.
* * *
§4159.2. Powers of the city council
A.(1) The city council may establish, by ordinance, procedures regarding the
billing policies of the board, including reducing or modifying a bill received by a
customer, or waiving late charges or accrued interest, subject to the authority
established by the billing ordinance as set forth in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(2) The city council shall establish a billing ordinance working group to
review and opine on ordinances before any such ordinance may be considered by the
Public Works, Sanitation, and Environmental Committee of the city council,
including evaluating the necessity of such an ordinance. This working group shall
convene within ninety days of August 1, 2022, to establish procedural guidelines and
within thirty days of the filing of an ordinance that impacts any aspect of the
Sewerage and Water Board of New Orleans billing process or policies. The findings
of this working group shall be made part of the official record before consideration
of any such ordinance drafted pursuant to this Section.
(3) The billing ordinance review working group shall be comprised of the
following members:
Page 8 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1243 ENROLLED
(a) The chairman of the New Orleans City Council Budget, Audit, and Board
of Review Committee, or his designee.
(b) The chairman of the New Orleans City Council Public Works, Sanitation,
and Environment Committee, or his designee.
(c) The chairman of the New Orleans City Council Governmental Affairs
Committee, or his designee.
(d) A member of the House of Representatives residing in Orleans Parish,
or his designee, appointed by the New Orleans City Council president.
(e) A member of the Senate residing in Orleans Parish, or his designee,
appointed by the New Orleans City Council president.
(f) The executive director of the Sewerage and Water Board of New Orleans,
or his designee.
(g) The president of the Sewerage and Water Board of New Orleans, or his
designee.
(4) The procedures established by the city council shall be uniformly
implemented so as to prevent special treatment as it relates to any bill modification
or amnesty. exercise regulatory authority and oversight over the board absent any
law to the contrary. This authority shall include but is not limited to the ability to
regulate and to require city council approval of the following:
(a) Rates, fees, and charges imposed by the board.
(b) The board's annual operating budgets.
(c) Creation, adoption, and implementation of capital budgets and capital
improvement plans.
(d) Board policies relating to billing, finance, operations, and governance,
including policies related to reducing or modifying a bill received by a customer, or
waiving late charges or accrued interest.
(e) Contracts entered into by the board.
(f) The election of the executive director and the hiring of board employees.
(2) Nothing in this Subsection shall be deemed to delegate powers held
exclusively by the legislature or to authorize the city council to enact any ordinance
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1243 ENROLLED
inconsistent with this Part or other applicable state law. In exercising its authority
under this Subsection, the city council shall not impair existing obligations of the
board.
B.(1) The city council may open an investigation of the board regarding any
matter within the scope of its regulatory authority, including after the occurrence of
any catastrophic failure of the city's sewerage and drainage infrastructure. Any
information regarding such a failure an investigation requested in writing from the
board by the city council shall be submitted to the council not later than thirty days
after receipt of the written request.
* * *
C. The city council may request the attendance of a representative of the
board at any meeting of the Public Works, Sanitation, and Environment Committee
of the city council or a council committee.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.